Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Financial Provisions.
Sec. 44.88.155.
Enterprise development account.

The enterprise development account is established in the revolving fund. The enterprise development account is a trust fund for the uses and purposes of this chapter. The enterprise development account consists of money or assets appropriated or transferred to the authority and other money or assets deposited in it by the authority.

The authority may establish in the enterprise development account the accounts it considers appropriate.

Money and other assets of the enterprise development account may be used to secure bonds of the authority issued to finance the purchase of loans for projects, to purchase participation in the loans for projects, or to fund a new markets tax credit assistance guarantee or loan under AS

44.88.700

—

44.88.799

.

A loan participation purchased by the authority with assets of the enterprise development account or with proceeds of bonds secured by assets of the enterprise development account

may not exceed $25,000,000; however, in the case of a loan participation for qualified energy development, the loan participation may exceed $25,000,000 with legislative approval;

may not be purchased unless

the project applicant is not, or, if the applicant is not a single proprietorship, all members of the business enterprise or enterprises constituting the project applicant are not, in default on another loan made by the state or by a public corporation of the state; and

at least 10 percent of the principal amount of the loan is retained by the loan originator, or the loan is for financing improvements in energy efficiency;

may not be purchased if the loan to be purchased exceeds 75 percent of the appraised value of the collateral offered as security for the loan unless the amount of the loan in excess of this limit is federally insured or guaranteed or is insured by a qualified mortgage insurance company, except that the loan to be purchased under this paragraph may not exceed the total of loan proceeds used to refinance an existing debt plus the cost of new construction, expansion, or acquisition unless the proceeds from the additional amounts of the loan to be purchased are restricted to uses approved by the authority to finance commercial activity in the state by a business enterprise;

may not be purchased if the participation in the loan to be purchased is for a term longer than the following, except that a loan under (A) or (C) of this paragraph may not have a term longer than three-quarters of the authority’s estimate of the life of the collateral offered as security for the loan:

40 years from the date the loan is made in the case of a loan participation for a project described in AS

44.88.900

(13)(E);

50 years from the date the loan is made in the case of a loan participation for qualified energy development;

25 years from the date the loan is made in the case of a loan participation for other projects;

may be made only if the participation in the loan to be purchased contains amortization provisions; the amortization provisions

must be complete and satisfactory to the authority and require periodic payments by the borrower;

may allow the loan originator to amortize the portion of the loan retained by the loan originator using a shorter amortization schedule than the amortization schedule for the portion of the loan held by the authority if

in the authority’s opinion, the project financed can support the increased debt service; and

the accelerated amortization schedule is required to induce the originator to make the loan;

may be made only if the participation in the loan to be purchased is in the form and contains the terms and provisions with respect to insurance, repairs, alterations, payment of taxes and assessments, default reserves, delinquency charges, default remedies, acceleration of maturity, secondary liens, and other matters the authority prescribes; and

may be made only if the participation in the loan to be purchased is secured as to repayment by a mortgage or other security instrument in the manner the authority determines is feasible to assure timely repayment under the loan documents entered into with the borrower.

The authority may adopt regulations for the administration of the enterprise development account including, without limitation, provisions for fees and agreements relating to application, loan commitment, servicing, and origination of loans by other lenders.

The authority may enter into agreements as to the use of the money in the enterprise development account, including without limitation, trust or custody arrangements with banks or trust companies. It may also pledge, assign, or grant the agreement, interests under an agreement, or interests in the enterprise development account as may be necessary or appropriate to provide for payment and security for bonds of the authority issued to finance the purchase by the authority of loans for projects.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the authority may waive or modify the requirements of this section as it considers appropriate and prudent in order to finance a project if the authority intends to own the project or in order to finance qualified energy development.

The provisions of this section apply only with respect to a loan participation purchased by the authority for projects under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

.

History.

(§ 65 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 38 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 7 ch 162 SLA 1984; am §§ 21 — 27 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 32 ch 141 SLA 1988; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 123 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1991; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 51 SLA 1992; am §§ 24, 25 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 6 ch 109 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 2003; am §§ 4, 5 ch 60 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 2012; am § 4 ch 39 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.61.155. Renumbered in 1980.

In 2012, in subsection (d), “AS

44.88.900

(10)(E)” was substituted for “AS

44.88.900

(9)(E)” to reflect the renumbering of paragraphs in AS 44.88.900.

In 2013, in subsection (d), “AS

44.88.900

(11)(E)” was substituted for “AS

44.88.900

(10)(E)” to reflect the renumbering of paragraphs in AS 44.88.900.

Administrative Code. —

For conduit revenue bond program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 1.

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.

For taxable loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, in (d)(1), (d)(4)(B), and (g), substituted “qualified energy development” for “a power transmission intertie”; in (d)(2)(B) added, “, or the loan is for financing improvements in energy efficiency”.

The second 2012 amendment, effective June 13, 2012, in (c), added “, or to fund a new markets tax credit assistance guarantee or loan under AS

44.88.700

—

44.88.799

”.

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (d)(1), twice substituted “$25,000,000” for “$20,000,000”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning
ch. 39, SLA 2015 (HB 105), see 2015 House Journal 188 — 192.

Sec. 44.88.156.
Multi-family housing loan account. [Repealed, § 44 ch 42 SLA 1987.]

Secs. 44.88.157,
44.88.158.
Loan insurance and loan insurance account; small business enterprise loan account. [Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 44.88.159.
Interest rates.

The interest rate on a loan purchased from the proceeds of tax-exempt bonds secured by the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS

44.88.660

) under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

or by the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS

44.88.810

) under AS

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

or a loan participation purchased from the proceeds of tax-exempt bonds or expected by the authority to be purchased from the proceeds of tax-exempt bonds under AS

44.88.155

shall be determined under the regulations adopted by the authority under AS

44.88.085(g)(2)(C)

and shall be not less than the cost of funds to the authority. In this subsection, “cost of funds” means the true interest cost expressed as a rate on tax-exempt bonds of the authority plus an additional percentage as determined by the authority to represent the allocable expenses of operation, costs of issuance, and loan servicing costs.

The interest rate on a loan purchased from the proceeds of taxable bonds secured by the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS

44.88.660

) under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

or by the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS

44.88.810

) under AS

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

or a loan participation purchased from the proceeds of taxable bonds under AS

44.88.155

or expected by the authority to be purchased from the proceeds of taxable bonds under AS

44.88.155

shall be determined under the regulations adopted by the authority under AS

44.88.085(g)(2)(C)

and shall be not less than the cost of funds to the authority. In this subsection, “cost of funds” means the true interest cost expressed as a rate on taxable bonds, plus an additional percentage as determined by the authority to represent the allocable expenses of operation, costs of issuance, and loan servicing costs.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

The provisions of this section apply only to a loan participation purchased under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or to a loan made under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

or

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

.

The interest rate on a loan made under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

or

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

or a loan participation purchased directly from the assets of the authority shall be determined under the regulations adopted by the authority under AS

44.88.085(g)(2)(C)

and shall be not less than the total of a percentage as determined by the authority to represent the allocable expenses of operation and costs of loan origination and servicing, plus the cost of funds. In this subsection,

“comparable financial security” means a type or category of financial security the authority identifies in the regulations adopted by the authority under AS

44.88.085(g)(2)(C)

that has a term and financial conditions comparable to the term and financial conditions of a loan participation or a loan made under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

or

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

and for which a regularly published, nationally recognized market index is available;

“cost of funds” means the earnings, expressed as an annual interest rate, the authority would receive on a comparable financial security, and, for a loan participation or a loan made under AS 44.88.650 — 44.88.690 or 44.88.800 — 44.88.840 with a fixed interest rate, the cost of funds must equal or exceed the minimum interest rate;

“minimum interest rate” means the five-year return on investment funds of the authority, expressed as an annual interest rate, achieved by all internal and external investment managers of the authority combined.

In determining an interest rate under the regulations adopted by the authority under AS

44.88.085(g)(2)(C)

, the authority may determine to disregard the minimum interest rate required under (a), (b), or (e) of this section for a loan participation purchased by the authority or a loan made under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

or

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

to resolve lending limits or reserve restrictions imposed on the financial institution and may instead determine to retain the interest rate existing at the time the authority makes the loan or purchases the authority’s loan participation.

The authority may, in the regulations adopted by the authority under AS

44.88.085(g)(2)(C)

, establish a program to pay to borrowers of loan participations determined by the authority to meet sufficient job creation, rural development, Arctic infrastructure development, renewable energy development, or other economic development criteria incentive rate rebates of not more than one percent of the interest rate charged on the authority’s portion of a loan participation. The following standards apply to the program:

the payment of an incentive rate rebate may reduce the interest rate to a rate that is less than the minimum interest rate required under (a), (b), or (e) of this section;

the authority may not commit to pay an incentive rate rebate for a proposed loan participation if the total of the amount of the proposed loan participation plus the combined outstanding balance of all loan participations for which the authority has committed to pay incentive rate rebates would exceed five percent of the total of the amount of the proposed loan participation plus the combined outstanding balance of all loan participations of the authority;

an incentive rate rebate may not accrue for more than five years after the date the loan participation is purchased;

the authority may establish a separate account for the incentive rate rebate program.

History.

(§ 41 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 54 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 34 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990; am §§ 8, 9 ch 51 SLA 1992; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 111 SLA 1996; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 73 SLA 2003; am §§ 2, 3 ch 69 SLA 2010; am §§ 6 — 11 ch 60 SLA 2012; am §§ 4 — 9 ch 93 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, “AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.700

—

44.88.740

” and “AS

44.88.660

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.710

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Cross references. —

For a provision excepting bonds issued before June 30, 2023 to finance a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska from the interest rate requirements of this section, see sec. 11,
ch. 26, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, as amended by sec. 12, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 9, 2010, rewrote (e); added (g).

The 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, in (a) and (b), added “a loan purchased from the proceeds of tax-exempt bonds secured by the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS

44.88.660

) under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

or” following “The interest rate on” and added “under AS

44.88.155

” following “tax-exempt bonds” once in (a) and twice in (b); once in (d), three times in (e), and once in (f), added “or a loan made under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

” or similar; in (f), near the end, substituted “makes the loan or purchases the authority’s loan participation” for “purchase a portion of the loan”; in the introductory language of (g), inserted “renewable energy development,” following “rural development,”.

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, in (a) and (b), inserted “or by the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS

44.88.810

) under AS

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

” preceding “or a loan participation”; in (d), added “or

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

” at the end; in (e), inserted “or 44.88.800 — 44.88.840” three times following “AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

”; in (f), inserted : or 44.88.800 — 44.88.840” following “AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

”; in (g), inserted “Arctic infrastructure development,” following “rural development.”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 69, SLA 2010 (SB 300), proposing amendments to this section to modernize the Authority’s lending practices, including changes to encourage the Authority’s loan participation financing and the development of an incentive rate rebate program, see 2010 Senate Journal 1661 — 1663.